Ohio, session 136, HB494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.57 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5.57. The third Sunday in November is designated as 6
"Road Traffic Victims Day of Remembrance," to honor the people 7
killed or seriously injured on the roads of this state and to 8
encourage road safety and support for road traffic victims and 9
their families. 10